Utah statutes.
4-24-24.   Utah Livestock Brand and Anti-Theft Account created -- Deposit of
fees -- Purpose of expenditures.
(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as
the Utah Livestock Brand and Anti-Theft Account.
(2)  The following monies shall be deposited into the Utah Livestock Brand and
Anti-Theft Account:
(a)  monies received by the department under any provision of this chapter;
and
(b)  monies received by the department under any provision of Title 4, Chapter
39, Domesticated Elk Act.
(3)  Monies in the Utah Livestock Brand and Anti-Theft Account shall be used
for the administration of this chapter and of Title 4, Chapter 39,
Domesticated Elk Act.
